District of Columbia statutes.
22-1702

Possession of lottery or policy tickets.

If any person shall, within the District of Columbia, knowingly have in his or her possession or under his control, any record, notation, receipt, ticket, certificate, bill, slip, token, paper, or writing, current or not current, used or to be used in violating the provisions of § 22-1701, § 22-1704, or § 22-1708, he or she shall, upon conviction of each such offense, be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both. For the purpose of this section, possession of any record, notation, receipt, ticket, certificate, bill, slip, token, paper, or writing shall be presumed to be knowing possession thereof.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 863a
Apr. 5, 1938, 52 Stat. 198, ch. 72, § 2
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 95, ch. 159, § 206(a)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(j), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(g), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(o), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1502.
1973 Ed., § 22-1502.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(g) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(o) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.